Nebraska, session 109, LB532.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 9 of this act:
(1) Agency means an agency, department, board, or commission of this
state or of a political subdivision of this state that issues a license
for purposes of operating a business in this state;
(2) Approved method of notice means certified mail or any other
manner of delivery by which the United States Postal Service can verify
delivery or by any method of service recognized under Chapter 25, article
5;
(3) Department means the Department of Labor;
(4) Employment has the same meaning as in section 48-604;
(5) Employee means an individual who performs labor or services in
this state for an employer pursuant to an employment relationship between
the person and employer;
(6)(a) Employer means a person engaged in an industry who has
twenty-five or more employees for each working day in each of twenty or
more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year.
(b) Employer does not include:
(i) Local, state, or federal governmental agencies or political
subdivisions or any corporation wholly owned by such an agency or
subdivision; or
(ii) An entity that hires a bona fide independent contractor;
(7) E-Verify means the electronic verification of the work
authorization program of the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant
Responsibility Act of 1996, 8 U.S.C. 1324a, or an equivalent federal
program designated by the United States Department of Homeland Security
or other federal agency authorized to verify the work eligibility status
of a newly hired employee pursuant to the Immigration Reform and Control
Act of 1986;
(8) License means any agency license, permit, certificate, approval,
registration, charter, or similar form of authorization required by law
and issued by an agency for the purpose of doing business in this state;
-2-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
and
(9) Unauthorized alien has the same meaning as in 8 U.S.C. 1324a(h)
(3).
Sec. 2. (1) An employer shall, after making an offer of employment
which has been accepted by an employee, verify the employment
authorization of each such employee using E-Verify. Such verification
shall occur within the period after hiring stipulated by federal law,
regulations, and procedures.
(2) If the commissioner determines that an employer has violated
this section, the commissioner shall notify the employer of such
determination using an approved method of notice. The employer has
fifteen working days after the date of the notice to contest such
citation or penalty. Notice of contest shall be sent to the commissioner
who shall provide a hearing in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(3)(a) Upon a final determination that an employer has violated this
section, the commissioner shall notify any agency which has issued a
license to such employer that such agency shall:
(i) Place such employer's license on probation for a period of one
year, during which time such employer shall file with the agency and the
department reports demonstrating the employer's compliance with sections
1 to 9 of this act; or
(ii) For a repeat violation, suspend such employer's license for a
period of at least ten days but not more than thirty days. The length of
such suspension shall be determined by the commissioner.
(b) For purposes of this section, a violation is a repeat violation
if the commissioner's notice regarding the violation under subsection (2)
of this section was sent within three years after the sending of a
previous notice under such subsection.
Sec. 3. (1) An employer shall not knowingly employ an unauthorized
alien. If an employer uses a contract, subcontract, or other independent
-3-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
contractor agreement to obtain the labor of an alien in this state, and
the employer knowingly contracts with an unauthorized alien or with a
person who employs or contracts with an unauthorized alien to perform the
labor, the employer violates this subsection.
(2) If the commissioner determines that an employer has violated
this section, the commissioner shall notify the employer of such
determination using an approved method of notice. The employer has
fifteen working days after the date of the notice to contest such
citation or penalty. Notice of contest shall be sent to the commissioner
who shall provide a hearing in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(3)(a) Upon a final determination that an employer has violated this
section, the commissioner shall notify any agency which has issued a
license to such employer of such determination.
(b) Within seventy-two hours after receiving such notice, the agency
shall suspend such employer's license. The license may be reinstated if
the employer:
(i) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the
unauthorized alien has been terminated; and
(ii) Pays the commission a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to
the greater of:
(A) The commission's costs in investigating and enforcing the
violation; or
(B) One thousand dollars.
(c) If the violation of this section involved five or more
unauthorized aliens, the suspension shall last for an additional period
following satisfaction of the reinstatement conditions under subdivision
(3)(b) of this section. Such period shall be determined by the
commissioner and shall be at least seven days and not more than thirty
days.
(d) For a second violation of this section occurring within three
-4-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
years after the date the commissioner sent the notice of a first
violation under subdivision (3)(a) of this section, the suspension shall
last for an additional period following satisfaction of the reinstatement
conditions under subdivision (3)(b) of this section. Such period shall be
determined by the commissioner and shall be at least thirty days and not
more than sixty days.
(e) For a third or subsequent violation of this section occurring
within six years after the date the commissioner sent the notice of a
first violation under subdivision (3)(a) of this section, the suspension
shall last for an additional one hundred eighty days following
satisfaction of the reinstatement conditions under subdivision (3)(b) of
this section.
(4) An employer who in good faith verifies the employment
authorization of a new employee using E-Verify shall, subject to rebuttal
by evidence, be presumed to have not knowingly violated this section.
(5) An employer who terminates an employee in order to comply with
this section shall not be subject to a civil action for wrongful
termination of the employee.
Sec. 4. The department shall develop and administer a statewide
random auditing program to inspect employers for compliance with sections
1 to 9 of this act.
Sec. 5. The department and its inspectors, agents, or designees
upon proper presentation of credentials to the owner, manager, or agent
of the employer may enter at reasonable times and have the right to
question either publicly or privately any employer, owner, manager or
agent and the employees of the employer and inspect, investigate,
reproduce, or photograph original business records relevant to
determining compliance with sections 1 to 9 of this act.
Sec. 6. (1) The department shall establish a dedicated public
website to assist employers in complying with sections 1 to 9 of this
act.
-5-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
(2) The department shall maintain a public database of violations of
sections 1 to 9 of this act on its public website.
Sec. 7. Each agency shall include notice of the requirements of
sections 1 to 9 of this act in any application for a license.
Sec. 8. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be implemented in a
manner consistent with the federal laws, regulations, and procedures
governing E-Verify and the employment of unauthorized aliens, protecting
the civil rights of all persons and respecting the privileges and
immunities of United States citizens.
Sec. 9. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out sections 1 to 9 of this act.
Sec. 10. Section 48-2911, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-2911 Any contract between the state or a political subdivision
and a contractor shall require that each contractor who performs
construction or delivery service pursuant to the contract submit to the
state or political subdivision an affidavit attesting that (1) each
individual performing services for such contractor is properly classified
under the Employee Classification Act, (2) such contractor has completed
a federal I-9 immigration form and has such form on file for each
employee performing services, (3) such contractor has complied with
sections 1 to 9 of this act section 4-114, (4) such contractor has no
reasonable basis to believe that any individual performing services for
such contractor is an undocumented worker, and (5) as of the time of the
contract, such contractor is not barred from contracting with the state
or any political subdivision pursuant to section 48-2907 or 48-2912. Such
contract shall also require that the contractor follow the provisions of
the Employee Classification Act. A violation of the act by a contractor
is grounds for rescission of the contract by the state or political
subdivision.
Sec. 11. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
-6-

LB532 LB532
2025 2025
Sec. 12. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 13. Original section 48-2911, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 14. The following section is outright repealed: Section 4-114,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-7-